Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4087.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Barbara Leff memorial; procedures; delayed repeal A. Pursuant to section 41-1363, subsection A, Arizona Revised Statutes, this act authorizes the legislative council to provide for the placement in the governmental mall of a memorial dedicated to the commemoration of Barbara Leff. B. The procedures prescribed in section 41-1363, Arizona Revised Statutes, apply to the establishment of the memorial. C. Public monies are not authorized for the costs of the memorial. All fundraising and contracts for artistic design and construction of the memorial are the sole responsibility of the proponents.  This state may not facilitate fundraising or establish a state fund for the deposit of the monies. D. This section is repealed from and after September 30, 2029. APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR APRIL 13, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE APRIL 13, 2026.